Colorado statutes. TITLE 30 Government - County
ARTICLE 5
COUNTY BOUNDARIES

Section

30-5-101. Legislative declaration - county boundaries.

The general assembly recognizes that in the establishment of the state of Colorado the counties of the territory of Colorado were adopted as the counties of the new state and that there have been additional counties established by law and in accordance with then current methods of surveying and describing county boundaries. The general assembly finds and declares that it is desirable to revise the descriptions of county boundaries to update and establish by law more precise definitions of the boundaries of the several counties of this state as they are known to exist with the use of modern methods and equipment. It is not the intent of the general assembly to effect the transfer of land from one county to another or to adversely affect the title of any property merely because of the redefinition of county boundaries.

The following shall be the boundaries of the respective counties of this state.

Source:

R.S.

p. 157, § 1.

G.L.

§ 350.

G.S.

§ 424.

R.S. 08:

§ 1082.

C.L.

§ 8559.

CSA:

C. 44, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 34-1-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 34-1-1.

L. 81:

p. 1427, § 1.

30-5-102. Adams.

Except for those portions that became part of the city and county of Broomfield on November 15, 2001, in accordance with sections 10 to 13 of article XX of the state constitution, all that portion of Arapahoe county, beginning at the northwest corner of Arapahoe county as now constituted, thence east along the north boundary line of said Arapahoe county to the northeast corner of said Arapahoe county, thence south along the east boundary line of said county to the southeast corner of said county, thence west along the south boundary line of said county to the east boundary line of range fifty-seven west, thence north along the said east boundary line to the intersection of the east boundary line of range fifty-seven and the south boundary line of township three in said range, thence west along the south boundary line of township three to the point of intersection of south boundary line of township three in range fifty-seven west, and the east boundary line of the city of Denver as the same is constituted at the time this section takes effect, thence northerly and westerly, following the easterly and northern boundary lines of said city of Denver as then constituted, to the point of intersection of said boundary lines with the west boundary line of Arapahoe county, thence north to the place of beginning, shall be set apart and is hereby established as a county to be called the county of Adams, which said county shall have the legal capacities and functions of other counties of this state.

Source:

L. 01:

p. 133, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 1083.

C.L.

§ 8560.

CSA:

C. 44, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 34-1-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 34-1-2.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 639, § 1, effective April 23.

30-5-103. Alamosa.

Beginning at the southwest corner of section eighteen, township thirty-six north, range nine east; thence north on the west line of range nine east to its intersection with the tenth standard parallel north; thence east on said parallel to its intersection with the crest of the mountain range that divides the waters of the streams flowing westerly into the San Luis Valley from the waters flowing easterly in the drainage of the Huerfano River; thence southerly along said crest to Blanca Peak; thence southwesterly along the crest of the mountain range that divides the waters of the streams flowing westerly into the San Luis Valley from the waters of the drainage of Blanca Creek to the peak on said crest lying two-tenths of a mile, more or less, southerly of Little Bear Peak, said peak being on the boundary of the Sangre de Cristo Grant; thence along a straight line, on the boundary of said Grant, running south forty-three degrees twenty minutes west, to its intersection with the southern boundary of the northern half of township thirty-six north; and thence west on said southern boundary to the point of beginning. Said public land survey lines are based upon the New Mexico principal meridian.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 19, § 1.

C.L.

§ 8561.

CSA:

C. 44, § 3.

CRS 53:

§ 34-1-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 34-1-3.

L. 81:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1427, § 2, effective July 1.

30-5-104. Arapahoe.

All that part of Arapahoe county as is included within the following described boundaries shall be set apart and is hereby established as a county, to be called the county of Arapahoe, the boundaries are as follows, to wit:

Beginning at the southwest corner of Arapahoe county; thence east to the intersection of the east boundary line of range fifty-seven west, with the south boundary line of Arapahoe county; thence north to the intersection of the east boundary line of range fifty-seven and south boundary line of township three in said range; thence west to the point of intersection of south boundary line of township three in range sixty-seven west and the east boundary line of the city of Denver as now constituted; thence following the eastern, southern and western boundary lines of the city of Denver as the same are constituted at the time this section goes into effect to a point where said boundary line of the city of Denver intersects the west boundary line of the county of Arapahoe; thence south to the southwest corner of Arapahoe, or place of beginning.

Source:

L. 01:

p. 138, § 1.

L. 03:

p. 164, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 1084.

C.L.

§ 8562.

CSA:

C. 44, § 4.

CRS 53:

§ 34-1-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 34-1-4.

30-5-105. Archuleta.

All that part of the county of Conejos included within the following described boundaries shall be set apart and is hereby established as a county, to be called the county of Archuleta, the boundaries of which are as follows:

Beginning on the southern boundary line of the state of Colorado at the intersection of said state line and the eastern boundary line of Tierra Amarilla Grant, which is thirty-seven and eleven one-hundredths chains west on said state line from the range line between ranges four and five east of the New Mexico principal meridian, and thence in a northwesterly direction following said east boundary line of the said Tierra Amarilla Grant to the north corner of said Tierra Amarilla Grant, and thence in the same direction until said line intersects with the range line between ranges two and three east of the New Mexico principal meridian, and thence north following said range line to the north boundary line of the county of Conejos, thence west along the southern boundary of the county of Mineral and the county of Hinsdale to the southwest corner of the said county of Hinsdale, thence south to the state line and thence east along the said southern boundary line of the state of Colorado to the place of beginning.

Source:

L. 1885:

p. 40, § 1.

L. 05:

p. 153, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 1085.

C.L.

§ 8563.

CSA:

C. 44, § 5.

CRS 53:

§ 34-1-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 34-1-5.

30-5-106. Baca.

Beginning at the intersection of the west line of range fifty west with the north line of township twenty-eight south; thence south along said range line to the southwest corner of township thirty south, range fifty west; thence west on the north line of township thirty-one south, range fifty west, to the northwest corner of said township and range; thence south on the west line of range fifty west to its intersection with the south boundary line of Colorado; thence east on said south boundary line to the southeast corner boundary of Colorado; thence north along the east boundary line of Colorado to its intersection with the north line of township twenty-eight south, range forty-one west; and thence west on the north line of township twenty-eight south to the place of beginning. Said public land survey lines are based upon the sixth principal meridian.

Source:

L. 1889:

p. 26, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 1086.

C.L.

§ 8564.

CSA:

C. 44, § 6.

CRS 53:

§ 34-1-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 34-1-6.

L. 81:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1428, § 3, effective July 1.

30-5-107. Bent.

The boundary lines of the county of Bent are as follows:

Commencing upon the eastern boundary line of Colorado territory at its intersection with township line between townships thirteen and fourteen south; thence west on said township line to the range line between ranges fifty-nine and sixty west; thence south on said range line to the township line between townships twenty-seven and twenty-eight south; thence east on said township line to the eastern boundary line of Colorado territory; thence north on said eastern boundary line to the place of beginning.

Source:

L. 1874:

p. 61, § 1.

G.L.

§ 376.

G.S.

§ 450.

R.S. 08:

§ 1087.

C.L.

§ 8565.

CSA:

C. 44, § 7.

CRS 53:

§ 34-1-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 34-1-7.

30-5-108. Greenwood abolished.

The county of Greenwood is hereby abolished, and that portion of it not included in the county of Elbert shall be for all purposes a part of the county of Bent.

Source:

L. 1874:

p. 62, § 2.

G.L.

omitted.

G.S.

§ 451.

R.S. 08:

§ 1088.

C.L.

§ 8566.

CSA:

C. 44, § 8.

CRS 53:

§ 34-1-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 34-1-8.

30-5-109. Boulder.

Boulder county: Except for those portions that became part of the city and county of Broomfield on November 15, 2001, in accordance with sections 10 to 13 of article XX of the state constitution, commencing at a point where the township line between townships one and two south intersects the range line between ranges sixty-eight and sixty-nine; thence west on said township line to the east line of Gilpin county; thence along said line to the South Boulder creek; thence west along the northern boundary line of Gilpin county to the summit of the snowy range; thence along the summit of first range to a point at or near the summit of Long's Peak; thence east on said township line to the range line between ranges sixty-eight and sixty-nine; thence south to the place of beginning.

Source:

L. 1861:

p. 55, § 22.

R.S.

p. 160, § 25.

G.L.

§ 363.

G.S.

§ 438.

R.S. 08:

§ 1089.

C.L.

§ 8567.

CSA:

C. 44, § 9.

CRS 53:

§ 34-1-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 34-1-9.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 639, § 2, effective April 23.

30-5-109.5. Broomfield, city and county of.

As of November 15, 2001, the corporate limits of the city and county of Broomfield shall be as follows: Two parcels of land in all or portions of sections one, two, three, four, five, six, seven, eight, and eleven, all in township two south, range sixty-nine west and a portion of section one, township two south, range seventy west; all or portions of sections twelve, thirteen, fourteen, fifteen, twenty-one, twenty-two, twenty-three, twenty-four, twenty-five, twenty-six, twenty-seven, twenty-eight, twenty-nine, thirty-two, thirty-three, thirty-four, thirty-five, and thirty-six all in township one south, range sixty-nine west; all or portions of sections two, three, four, five, six, seven, eight, nine, ten, fifteen, sixteen, seventeen, eighteen, nineteen, twenty, twenty-one, twenty-nine, thirty, thirty-one, thirty-two, and thirty-three all in township one south, range sixty-eight west; and all or portions of sections twenty-three, twenty-six, twenty-seven, thirty-one, thirty-two, thirty-three, thirty-four, and thirty-five all in township one north, range sixty-eight west, all of the sixth principal meridian, Broomfield county, Colorado, except for those parcels otherwise remaining in the counties of Adams, Boulder, Jefferson, and Weld on and after November 15, 2001, pursuant to sections 10 to 13 of article XX of the state constitution.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire section added, p. 640, § 3, effective April 23.

30-5-110. Chaffee.

Chaffee county: Commencing at a point on the summit of the snowy range, at the northwest corner of the county of Park, and running due west to the western boundary of the state; thence south, on said boundary, to the summit of the Sierra La Plata, or the northwest corner of Conejos county; thence easterly along the northern boundary of Conejos county to the one hundred and seventh degree of longitude; thence north, following said degree, to the northwest corner of Saguache county; thence east, along the north boundary of Saguache county, to the top of the range at the Poncho pass; thence northeasterly along the summit of the range, crossing the Arkansas river, at a point three miles below the mouth of the South Arkansas river; thence easterly to the summit of the range which divides the waters of the Platte and Arkansas rivers, along the summit of the range and western boundaries of the counties of Fremont and Park, in a northwesterly direction to the point of beginning.

Source:

L. 1872:

p. 82, § 2.

G.L.

§ 368.

G.S.

§ 443.

R.S. 08:

§ 1090.

C.L.

§ 8568.

CSA:

C. 44, § 10.

CRS 53:

§ 34-1-10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 34-1-10.

30-5-111. Cheyenne.

So much of the counties of Bent and Elbert as is included within the following described boundaries, shall be set apart and is hereby established as a county, with the legal capacity and functions of other counties of this state, to be called the county of Cheyenne:

Beginning at a point on the eastern boundary line of the state of Colorado, where the same is intersected by the line between townships numbered eleven and twelve south; thence west on said township line to the west side of range fifty-one, west of the sixth principal meridian; thence south on said range line to the township line between townships numbered sixteen and seventeen south; thence east on said township line to the eastern boundary line of the state of Colorado; thence north on said state line to the place of beginning.

Source:

L. 1889:

p. 56, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 1091.

C.L.

§ 8569.

CSA:

C. 44, § 11.

CRS 53:

§ 34-1-11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 34-1-11.

30-5-112. Clear Creek.

Clear Creek county: Commencing at the junction of North and South Clear creeks, and running thence up the dividing ridge between said streams, to the summit of the snowy range; thence along said summit to the point where the first correction line south, if continued, would intersect said summit; thence east on said correction line to the western boundary of the county of Jefferson; thence north to the place of beginning.

Source:

R.S.

p. 161, § 29.

G.L.

§ 365.

G.S.

§ 440.

R.S. 08:

§ 1092.

C.L.

§ 8570.

CSA:

C. 44, § 12.

CRS 53:

§ 34-1-12.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 34-1-12.

30-5-113. Conejos.

Conejos county: Commencing on the southern boundary of the state, in the center of the Rio Grande del Norte; thence up the center of said stream to where it leaves the canyon of the snowy range at the corner of Saguache county; thence in a northwesterly direction along the western boundary of said Saguache county to the Cochetopa pass; thence in a southwesterly direction on the summit of the Uncompahgre mountains and the Sierra La Plata, forming the southern boundary of Lake county, to the western line of the state; thence along the western boundary of the state to its southwest corner; thence along the southern boundary of the state to the place of beginning.

Source:

R.S.

p. 158, § 6.

G.L.

§ 353.

G.S.

§ 428.

R.S. 08:

§ 1093.

C.L.

§ 8571.

CSA:

C. 44, § 13.

CRS 53:

§ 34-1-13.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 34-1-13.

30-5-114. Costilla.

Costilla county: Commencing at a point on the southeastern boundary of the state, where the range line between ranges sixty-nine and seventy intersects said boundary; thence north along said range line to the point where the same intersects the Sangre de Cristo pass or road; thence in a southwesterly direction on said road to the summit of the Sangre de Cristo range; thence in a northerly and westerly direction along the summit of said range to the head of the main branch of the Mosco creek; thence in a southwesterly direction down the center of said Mosco creek to where said creek enters into the San Luis valley; thence in a westerly direction to the most easterly point of La Loma del Norte; thence down the center of the Rio Grande del Norte to the southern boundary of the state; thence east along said boundary to the place of beginning.

Source:

R.S.

p. 157, § 2.

G.L.

§ 351.

G.S.

§ 425.

R.S. 08:

§ 1094.

C.L.

§ 8572.

CSA:

C. 44, § 14.

CRS 53:

§ 34-1-14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 34-1-14.

30-5-115. Crowley.

So much of the county of Otero as is included in the following described boundaries shall be set apart and is hereby established, with the legal capacities and functions of other counties in this state, as a county, to be called the county of Crowley:

Beginning at the northwest corner of Otero county; running thence east along the north boundary line of said Otero county to the range line between ranges fifty-four and fifty-five, west of the sixth principal meridian, which range line is the west boundary line of Kiowa county; thence south along said range and county line to the fourth correction line south to a point at the southwest corner of said Kiowa county; thence west along said correction line to the range line between ranges fifty-four and fifty-five west, in township twenty-one south; thence south on said range line to the south line of said township twenty-one south, to a point at the southeast corner of section thirty-six, in said township twenty-one, range fifty-five west; thence west along the south line of said township to the range line between ranges fifty-five and fifty-six west; thence south along said range line, four miles, more or less, to the southwest corner of section twenty-four, township twenty-two, south, range fifty-six west; thence west along the south line of sections twenty-four, twenty-three, twenty-two, twenty-one, twenty and nineteen, in range fifty-six west; thence continuing west on the south line of sections twenty-four, twenty-three, twenty-two and twenty-one in said township twenty-two south, range fifty-seven west, to where said section line intersects the center of the Arkansas river; thence north and northwesterly with the center and meanderings of said river to the west boundary line of said Otero county; thence north along said boundary line to the fourth correction line south; thence east along said correction line to the range line between ranges fifty-nine and sixty, which range line is the west boundary line of said Otero county; thence north along said range line to the place of beginning.

Source:

L. 11:

p. 277, § 1.

C.L.

§ 8573.

CSA:

C. 44, § 15.

CRS 53:

§ 34-1-115.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 34-1-15.

30-5-116. Custer.

All that section of country now forming a portion of Fremont county, and further described in this section, is hereby created, set apart, and established as the county of Custer, and shall possess all such legal functions and capacities as other counties in this state. The new county of Custer shall be bounded as follows:

Commencing at a point on the summit of the Sangre de Cristo range of mountains where the fourth correction line south, if extended, would cross said range of mountains; thence running east along said fourth correction line to the line between ranges sixty-eight and sixty-nine west of the sixth principal meridian; thence south along said line to the north line of Huerfano county; thence westerly along said north line of Huerfano county to the summit of the Sangre de Cristo range of mountains; thence northerly and northwesterly, along the summit of the Sangre de Cristo range of mountains, to the place of beginning.

Source:

G.L.

§§ 401, 402.

G.S.

§§ 465, 466.

R.S. 08:

§§ 1095, 1096.

C.L.

§§ 8574, 8575.

CSA:

C. 44, §§ 16, 17.

CRS 53:

§ 34-1-16.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 34-1-16.

30-5-117. Delta.

So much of the county of Gunnison as is included within the following described boundaries shall be set apart and is hereby established as a county, with the legal capacity and functions of other counties of this state, to be called the county of Delta:

Beginning at a point two miles south of the third correction line extended west to a point of intersection with the 107 degrees, 30 minutes west longitude; thence due north along said degree of longitude to the divide between the headwaters of the Colorado and North Fork of the Gunnison rivers; thence along said divide in a southwesterly direction to a point on the extreme southwestern extremity of the Grand Mesa; thence in a southwesterly direction to the mouth of the Rio Dominguez; thence due south to a point two miles south of an extension of the third correction line; thence due east parallel with said extension of the third correction line to place of beginning.

Source:

L. 1883:

p. 124, § 1.

G.S.

§ 472.

R.S. 08:

§ 1097.

C.L.

§ 8576.

CSA:

C. 44, § 18.

CRS 53:

§ 34-1-17.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 34-1-17.

30-5-118. Denver, city and county of.

After April 16, 1901, the corporate limits of the city of Denver shall be as follows:

Beginning at the northwest corner of the southwest quarter of section eighteen, in township three south, range sixty-eight west; thence south on the range line between ranges sixty-eight and sixty-nine west, to the southwest corner of section seven, in township four south, range sixty-eight west; thence east on the south line of sections seven and eight, in township four south, range sixty-eight west, to southeast corner of section eight aforesaid; thence south on the west line of section sixteen, in said last mentioned township and range, to the southwest corner of said section sixteen; thence east on the south line of said section sixteen, to the northwest corner of the northeast quarter of section twenty-one, in said last mentioned township and range; thence south on the north and south center line of sections twenty-one and twenty-eight, in the same township and range, to the southwest corner of the southeast quarter of said section twenty-eight; thence east on the south line of sections twenty-eight, twenty-seven, twenty-six, and twenty-five, in the same township and range, to the southeast corner of section twenty-five; thence north on the east line of sections twenty-five, twenty-four and thirteen, in the same township and range, to the southwest corner of section seven, in township four south, range sixty-seven west; thence east on the south line of sections seven, eight and nine, in said last mentioned township, to the southeast corner of said section nine; thence north on the east line of sections nine and four, in said last mentioned township and of sections thirty-three, twenty-eight and twenty-one, in township three south, range sixty-seven west, to the northeast corner of said section twenty-one; thence west on the south line of sections sixteen, seventeen and eighteen, in said last mentioned township, to the southwest corner of section eighteen last aforesaid; thence north on the west line of said last mentioned section eighteen to the northeast corner of the south half of the northeast quarter of section thirteen, in township three south, range sixty-eight west; thence west on the east and west center line of the north half of section thirteen aforesaid, to the easterly line of the right-of-way of the Burlington and Colorado railroad company; thence southeasterly, with the easterly line of said right-of-way, to the north line of the southeast quarter of section fourteen, in township three south, range sixty-eight west; thence west on the east and west center line of section fourteen aforesaid, to a point which is one hundred and twenty-five feet east of the west line of said section fourteen; thence north three hundred feet; thence west one hundred and twenty-five feet to the west line of said section fourteen; thence south three hundred feet, to the northwest corner of the southwest quarter of said section fourteen; thence west on the east and west center line of sections fifteen, sixteen and seventeen, in said last mentioned township, to the center of said section seventeen; thence west on the east and west center line of said section seventeen, thirteen hundred and twenty feet; thence north three hundred and thirty feet; thence west thirteen hundred and twenty feet to the west line of said section seventeen; thence south three hundred and thirty feet to the northwest corner of the southwest quarter of said section seventeen; thence west on the east and west center line of section eighteen, to the place of beginning; the territory included within the last above described boundaries being situated in the county of Arapahoe, in the state of Colorado; excepting, however, all towns and cities incorporated and now existing or hereafter incorporated under the general laws of the state and situated within said last mentioned boundaries.

Whenever any of said towns or cities, or any town or city existing under general laws of this state and contiguous to the city of Denver, shall, in pursuance of any law of the state, be dissolved or become annexed to the city of Denver, then the territory included within the same shall thereby become part of the city of Denver. If any such territory is so annexed more than six months prior to the next general election of the city of Denver, the city council of the city of Denver shall immediately by ordinance create a new ward or wards of the city, including said territory, and provide for and call a special election in each new ward so created, for the election of an alderman from such ward, in accordance with the provisions of this section and of the general election laws of this state; and the alderman so elected from each new ward shall, upon his election and qualification, be and become a member of the board of aldermen and of the city council of the city of Denver, until the next general election for officers of said city.

Source:

L. 01:

p. 162, § 2.

R.S. 08:

§ 1098.

C.L.

§ 8577.

CSA:

C. 44, § 19.

CRS 53:

§ 34-1-18.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 34-1-18.

30-5-119. Dolores.

The county of Dolores is hereby created and established, with the legal capacities and functions of other counties of this state, and with boundaries as follows:

Commencing at the summit of the mountain known as the "Lizard's Head," near the headwaters of the Lake Fork of the San Miguel river, in the present county of Ouray; thence westward from the summit of said mountain along the summit of the range dividing the waters of the San Miguel and Dolores rivers to the summit of Lone Cone mountain; thence west to the western line of the state of Colorado; thence south along said western line to the north line of Montezuma county; thence east along said north line to the southwest corner of San Juan county; thence northeast along the summit of the range dividing the waters of the South Fork of Dolores river from the waters of Hermosa and Cascade creeks to the summit of the range at the head of the East Fork of the Dolores river; thence northeast along the summit of the range dividing the waters of said South Fork of Dolores river from the waters of the Lake Fork of the San Miguel river to the summit of said range south of the pass now crossed by the trail from the Fish lakes to Rico; thence from the summit of said range on a direct line to the summit of said "Lizard's Head" mountain, the place of beginning.

Source:

L. 1881:

p. 92, § 1.

G.S.

§ 473.

R.S. 08:

§ 1099.

C.L.

§ 8578.

CSA:

C. 44, § 20.

CRS 53:

§ 34-1-19.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 34-1-19.

30-5-120. Douglas.

Beginning at the intersection of the center of the South Platte River with the first standard parallel south; thence east on said parallel to its intersection with the eastern boundary of the western half of range sixty-five west; thence south on said eastern boundary to its intersection with the south line of township ten south; thence west on said township line to its intersection with the center of the South Platte River; and thence northeasterly along the center of said river to the place of beginning. Said public land survey lines are based upon the sixth principal meridian.

Source:

R.S.

p. 159, § 17.

G.L.

§ 359.

G.S.

§ 434.

R.S. 08:

§ 1100.

C.L.

§ 8579.

CSA:

C. 44, § 21.

CRS 53:

§ 34-1-20.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 34-1-20.

L. 81:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1428, § 4, effective July 1.

30-5-121. Eagle.

The county of Eagle is hereby created and established, with the legal capacities and functions of other counties of this state, and with boundaries as follows:

Commencing at a point on the northern boundary of Lake county where the divide between the Eagle river and Ten Mile branches from and leaves the National range; thence along the summit of the said divide and the dividing ridge between the Piney and the Blue rivers to the southern line of Grand county; thence due west to a point six miles west of the 107th degree of west longitude; thence due south to the northern boundary line of Pitkin county; thence east along said boundary line to the summit of the National range; thence in an easterly direction along said summit of the National range to the place of beginning.

Source:

L. 1883:

p. 127, § 1.

G.S.

§ 474.

R.S. 08:

§ 1101.

C.L.

§ 8580.

CSA:

C. 44, § 22.

CRS 53:

§ 34-1-21.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 34-1-21.

30-5-122. Elbert.

So much of the county of Douglas as is included in the following described boundaries shall be set apart and is hereby established with the same legal capacity and functions as other counties of this state, to be called Elbert county:

Beginning at a point where the center of range sixty-five west intersects the first correction line south; thence east on said correction line to the eastern boundary of the state; thence south on said eastern boundary line to the line between townships thirteen and fourteen south; thence west on said line to the line between ranges fifty-nine and sixty west; thence north on said last mentioned line to the second correction line south; thence west on said second correction line to the center of range sixty-five west; thence north through the center of range sixty-five to the place of beginning.

Source:

L. 1874:

pp. 60, 61, §§ 1, 2.

G.L.

§§ 380, 381.

G.S.

§§ 457, 458.

R.S. 08:

§§ 1102, 1103.

C.L.

§§ 8581, 8582.

CSA:

C. 44, §§ 23, 24.

CRS 53:

§ 34-1-22.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 34-1-22.

30-5-123. El Paso.

Beginning at the intersection of the west line of range sixty-seven west with the south line of township seventeen south; thence north on said range line to the northwest corner of section six, township sixteen south, range sixty-seven west; thence east on the north line of said section six to the southwest corner of section thirty-one, township fifteen south, range sixty-seven west; thence north on the west line of range sixty-seven west to the northwest corner of section thirty-one, township fourteen south, range sixty-seven west; thence west on section lines to the southwest corner of section twenty-five, township fourteen south, range sixty-nine west; thence north on section lines to the northwest corner of section one, township fourteen south, range sixty-nine west; thence east on the north line of township fourteen south to the southwest corner of section thirty-two, township thirteen south, range sixty-eight west; thence north on section lines to the second standard parallel south; thence east on said parallel to its intersection with the east line of range sixty west; thence south on said range line to its intersection with the south line of township seventeen south; and thence west on said township line to the place of beginning. Said public land survey lines are based upon the sixth principal meridian.

Source:

R.S.

p. 159, § 15.

G.L.

§ 358.

G.S.

§ 433.

R.S. 08:

§ 1104.

C.L.

§ 8583.

CSA:

C. 44, § 25.

CRS 53:

§ 34-1-23.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 34-1-23.

L. 81:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1428, § 5, effective July 1.

30-5-124. Fremont.

Beginning at the intersection of the fourth standard parallel south with the east line of range sixty-eight west; thence north on said range line to its intersection with the northern boundary of the southern half of township sixteen south; thence west on said northern boundary to the southeast corner of section seventeen, township sixteen south, range seventy west; thence north on section lines to the third standard parallel south; thence west on said parallel to its intersection with the crest of the divide on the east side of the drainage areas of the Arkansas River, being a point approximately one-half mile east of the southwest corner of section thirty-five, township fifteen south, range seventy-seven west; thence southerly along said crest, via Cameron Mountain, to a point on said crest divide lying north eighty-four degrees twenty-five minutes east, eighty-eight hundred and ninety-seven feet from a point on the Arkansas River three miles below the mouth of the South Arkansas River; thence westerly on a straight line to said point on the Arkansas River; thence on a straight line bearing south forty-five degrees ten minutes west, to the intersection of said line with the crest of the Sangre de Cristo Range; thence southeasterly along said crest to its intersection with the fourth standard parallel south; thence east on said parallel to the place of beginning. Said public land survey lines are based upon the sixth principal meridian.

Source:

R.S.

p. 159, § 12.

G.L.

§ 356.

G.S.

§ 431.

R.S. 08:

§ 1105.

C.L.

§ 8584.

CSA:

C. 44, § 26.

CRS 53:

§ 34-1-24.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 34-1-24.

L. 81:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1429, § 6.

30-5-125. Garfield.

The county of Garfield is established with the legal capacities and functions of other counties in this state, and with boundaries as follows:

Beginning at the southwest corner of the southeast part of Routt county, or the 107th degree of west longitude; thence running due west six miles; thence running due south to the northern line of Pitkin county; thence running due west on the southern line of Summit county to the Utah line; thence running north on the western line of Summit county to Routt county; thence running east on the north line of Summit county to the 107th degree of west longitude; thence south on the 107th degree of west longitude to the starting point.

Source:

L. 1883:

p. 130, § 1.

G.S.

§ 475.

R.S. 08:

§ 1106.

C.L.

§ 8585.

CSA:

C. 44, § 27.

CRS 53:

§ 34-1-25.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 34-1-25.

30-5-126. Gilpin.

Beginning at the confluence of the center of North Clear Creek with the center of Clear Creek; thence due north to the center of South Boulder Creek; thence up the center of South Boulder Creek to where it intersects the monumented survey line between Gilpin and Boulder counties; thence due west along said monumented survey line to the crest of the continental divide; thence southerly on the continental divide to its intersection with the dividing ridge between North Clear Creek and Clear Creek drainage basins; and thence southeasterly along said ridge to the place of beginning.

Source:

R.S.

p. 161, § 31.

G.L.

§ 366.

G.S.

§ 441.

R.S. 08:

§ 1107.

C.L.

§ 8586.

CSA:

C. 44, § 28.

CRS 53:

§ 34-1-26.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 34-1-26.

L. 81:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1429, § 7, effective July 1.

30-5-127. Gilpin and Jefferson counties, boundary between.

That portion of the eastern boundary line of the county of Gilpin and that portion of the western boundary line of the county of Jefferson lying between the northwest corner of the county of Jefferson and the junction of the North and South Clear creeks, is fixed and established as follows:

Beginning at a certain point on the north line of township two south, range seventy-two west of the sixth principal meridian, which point is due north of the junction of the North and South Clear creeks; thence due south to the junction of the North and South Clear creeks; but Jefferson county shall not be liable for any taxes already collected on lands lying west of the boundary hereby established.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 284, § 1.

C.L.

§ 8587.

CSA:

C. 44, § 29.

CRS 53:

§ 34-1-27.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-1-27.

30-5-128. Grand.

So much of the county of Summit, in the state of Colorado, as is included within the following described boundaries, shall be set apart and is hereby created into a new county, to be called Grand county:

Beginning on the summit of the snowy range of the Rocky mountains, on the west boundary of Clear Creek county, at the point where the dividing range between the waters of Williams Fork and Blue river diverges from the main snowy range; running thence northwest along the summit of said dividing range between Williams Fork and Blue river to a point of intersection with the boundary line between townships one and two, south of the base line; thence west along said township line to the eastern boundary of the Ute Indian reservation; thence north along said boundary to the northeast corner of said reservation; thence west along the north boundary of said reservation to the west boundary of the state; thence north to the northwest corner of the same; thence east along the north boundary of the state to the northwest corner of Larimer county; thence south along the western boundaries of Larimer, Boulder and Gilpin counties, and west, northwest and southwest, along the north and west boundaries of Clear Creek county, to the place of beginning.

Source:

L. 1874:

p. 70, §§ 1, 2.

G.L.

§§ 382, 383.

G.S.

§§ 459, 460.

R.S. 08:

§§ 1108, 1109.

C.L.

§§ 8588, 8589.

CSA:

C. 44, §§ 30, 31.

CRS 53:

§ 34-1-128.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 34-1-28.

30-5-129. Gunnison.

The county of Gunnison is hereby created and established, with the legal capacity and functions of other counties of this state, and with boundaries as follows:

Commencing at a point on the south line of Lake county where the said line crosses the summit of the range of mountains forming the watershed between the waters of the Arkansas river and the streams draining westward into the Colorado river, known as the Saguache range; thence northward, along the summit of such range, to the north line of said Lake county; thence due west to the western line of the state; thence south along the west line of the state to the point where the north line of the county of Ouray intersects the same; thence east along the north line of Ouray county and the north line of Hinsdale county, to the west line of Saguache county; thence north along said west line to the northwest corner of Saguache county; thence east along the north line of Saguache county to the place of beginning.

Source:

G.L.

§ 411.

G.S.

§ 467.

R.S. 08:

§ 1110.

C.L.

§ 8590.

CSA:

C. 44, § 32.

CRS 53:

§ 34-1-129.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 34-1-29.

30-5-130. Hinsdale.

The county of Hinsdale shall be bounded as follows:

Commencing at the point of intersection of the ninth correction line north with the New Mexico principal meridian, and running thence north along said principal meridian to the southern boundary of Saguache county; thence westerly along the southern boundary of Saguache county to the one hundred and seventh meridian of longitude west from Greenwich; thence north along said meridian to a point ten miles north of the thirty-eighth parallel of north latitude; thence west to a point due north of a point six miles west of the mouth of Lost Trail creek, on the Rio Grande river; thence south to the point of intersection with the ninth correction line north; thence east along said correction line to the place of beginning.

Source:

L. 1874:

p. 66, § 2.

G.L.

§ 378.

G.S.

§ 454.

R.S. 08:

§ 1111.

C.L.

§ 8591.

CSA:

C. 44, § 33.

CRS 53:

§ 34-1-30.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 34-1-30.